Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1806
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-1801 to 44-1806 shall be known and may be cited as the Unauthorized Insurers False Advertising Process Act.

Laws 1965, c. 247, § 7, p. 702;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 181.